Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.410

Payroll deductions authorized for certificated employees—Savings.

Nothing in RCW 28A.405.400 shall be construed to annul or modify any lawful agreement heretofore entered into between any school district and any representative of its employees or other existing lawful agreements and obligations in effect on May 23, 1972.

[ 1990 c 33 s 402; 1972 ex.s. c 39 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.67.096.]